Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3609
Rules and regulations.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Medicare Supplement Insurance Minimum Standards Act.

Laws 1980, LB 877, § 9;

Laws 1981, LB 329, § 8;

Laws 1988, LB 998, § 10;

Laws 1992, LB 1006, § 27.